District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0119.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Official Sports Capital of the United States Designation Amendment Act
of 2025”.
TITLE I. DESIGNATION OF THE DISTRICT AS THE OFFICIAL SPORTS CAPITAL
OF THE UNITED STATES.
Sec. 101. Short title.
This title may be cited as the “Sense of the Council on the Designation of the District of
Columbia as the Official Sports Capital of the United States Act of 2025”.
Sec. 102. The Council finds that:
(1) The District of Columbia is home to numerous professional, collegiate, and
amateur sports teams, including the Washington Wizards, Washington Mystics, Washington
Nationals, Washington Capitals, D.C. United, Washington Spirit, D.C. Defenders, Old Glory
DC, and DC Breeze.
(2) The District has hosted premier national and international sporting events,
including the MLB All-Star Game, NBA All-Star Game, NHL Winter Classic, WNBA All-Star
Game, the Mubadala Citi DC Open, World Cup qualifiers, and the Army-Navy Game,
showcasing its capacity as a global sports hub.
(3) The District’s unique status as the nation’s capital, and its accessibility,
infrastructure, and sports culture make it the most fitting city to serve as the Official Sports
Capital of our nation.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(4) The District continues to invest in world-class sports venues such as the
Capital One Arena, Nationals Park, Audi Field, Robert F. Kennedy Memorial Stadium Campus,
and the CareFirst Arena, further enhancing its reputation as a premier sports destination.
(5) The District plays a critical role in advancing equity and inclusivity in sports,
fostering youth participation through programs like the Department of Parks and Recreation’s
community athletics initiatives, and supporting diversity in sports leadership and opportunities.
(6) Designation of the District as the “Official Sports Capital of the United States”
will boost tourism, economic development, and national recognition of the District’s rich sports
culture and history.
Sec. 103. It is the sense of the Council that the District of Columbia shall be designated
as the only “Official Sports Capital of the United States”.
TITLE II. PLAN TO PROMOTE THE DISTRICT AS THE OFFICIAL SPORTS
CAPITAL OF THE UNITED STATES.
Sec. 201. Short title.
This title may be cited as the “Sports Incentives and Marketing Amendment Act of
2025”.
Sec. 202. Title II of the Washington Convention Center Authority Act of 1994, effective
September 28, 1994 (D.C. Law 10-188; D.C. Official Code § 10-1202.01 et seq.), is amended as
follows:
(a) Section 203 (D.C. Official Code § 10-1202.03) is amended by adding a new
paragraph (10N) to read as follows:
“(10N) To direct no less than $500,000 per fiscal year to support the solicitation
and selection of a qualified organization to host marquee sports related events designed to attract
sports business professionals, including sports media executives, league commissioners, and
sports agency professionals;”.
(b) A new section 203b is added to read as follows:
“Sec. 203b. Plan to promote the District as the Official Sports Capital of the United
States.
“(a) The Authority shall develop and implement a plan to promote and enhance the
District’s status as the Official Sports Capital of the United States, which shall include:
“(1) Initiatives to attract and retain major sporting events, conferences,
conventions, and tournaments;
“(2) Strategies to increase investment in youth sports and community athletic
programs;
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(3) Partnerships with professional, collegiate, and amateur teams to engage
residents and visitors;
“(4) Marketing and branding efforts to highlight the District’s role as the nation’s
premier sports hub; and
“(5) A dedicated focus on developing the District as the national leader in
electronic sports, including support for electronic sports tournaments, career pathway programs
into electronic sports, digital infrastructure, and engagement of local youth and emerging talent.
“(b) No later than 120 days after the effective date of the Official Sports Capital of the
United States Designation Amendment Act of 2025, passed on 2nd reading on October 7, 2025
(Enrolled version of Bill 26-119), the Authority shall submit to the Council the plan required
pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.”.
TITLE III. STANDARD PROVISIONS.
Sec. 301. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 302. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Code § 1-206(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
3